Connecticut, session 2026, SB00221.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-156ii of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established an aspiring educators [diversity] scholarship
program administered by the Department of Education. The program
shall provide an annual scholarship to [diverse students] aspiring
educators who (1) graduated from a public high school in [an alliance
district, as defined in section 10-262u] this state, and (2) are enrolled in
a teacher preparation program at any four-year institution of higher
education. [A diverse student] An aspiring educator may receive an
annual scholarship in an amount up to ten thousand dollars for each
year such [diverse student] aspiring educator is enrolled and in good
standing in a teacher preparation program. As used in this section,
["diverse" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-156bb]
"aspiring educator" means an individual who is in a population
subgroup that is underrepresented in the teaching profession in this
state and for which such population subgroup has been identified as a
teacher shortage area by the Commissioner of Education pursuant to
section 10-8b, as amended by this act.
(b) Not later than January 1, [2023] 2027, the department shall, in
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 221
consultation with the chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education,
develop a policy concerning the administration of the scholarship. Such
policy shall include, but need not be limited to, provisions regarding (1)
any additional eligibility criteria, (2) payment and distribution of the
scholarships to [diverse students] aspiring educators through the
teacher preparation programs in which they are enrolled, and (3) the
notification of students in high school [in alliance districts] of the
scholarship program, including the opportunity to apply for a
scholarship under the program while enrolled in high school and prior
to graduation if such student will be enrolled in a teacher preparation
program during the following fall semester at a four-year institution of
higher education.
(c) For the fiscal years ending June 30, [2024] 2027, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the department shall annually award scholarships in
accordance with the provisions of this section and the guidelines
developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The Commissioner of Education shall develop scholarship
repayment criteria for recipients who are not employed as a certified
teacher by a local or regional board of education in [the] this state
following graduation from a teacher preparation program. Any
amounts repaid to the department shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(e) On or before March first of each year, the commissioner shall
determine if there are any unexpended funds appropriated for purposes
of this section for the fiscal year. If the commissioner determines that
there are unexpended funds, the commissioner may expend up to two
hundred fifty thousand dollars of such unexpended funds for the
purpose of implementing the plan to promote the teaching profession
developed pursuant to section 10-155m.
[(e)] (f) The department may accept gifts, grants and donations, from
any source, public or private, for the aspiring educators [diversity]
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 221
scholarship program.
[(f)] (g) Not later than January 1, [2024] 2028, and annually thereafter,
the department shall develop a report that includes annual data on the
[race and ethnicity of the diverse] population subgroups of students
who receive a scholarship under the program and the teacher
preparation program in which they are enrolled. The department shall
submit such report to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
Sec. 2. Section 10-8b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Education shall annually, by December first,
[determine subject and geographic] identify the following areas in
which a teacher shortage exists: [and] (1) Subject, (2) geographic, and (3)
population subgroups that are underrepresented in the teaching
profession in this state. The commissioner shall certify such [shortages]
teacher shortage areas to the Connecticut Housing Finance Authority
for purposes of section 8-265pp. In [determining] identifying such
teacher [shortages] shortage areas, the commissioner shall consider the
following: [(1)] (A) The number of teacher vacancies in a particular
subject area or geographic area; [(2)] (B) the number of new certificates
in such subject areas and geographic areas or population subgroups
issued by the Department of Education during the preceding year; [and
(3)] (C) the number and types of classes being taught by persons whose
training is not specific to the field in which they are teaching; and (D)
those population subgroups that are underrepresented in the teaching
profession in this state using data collected in the state-wide public
school information system pursuant to section 10-10a.
(b) The Department of Education shall annually, by March first,
electronically distribute to the president of every institution of higher
education in this state offering a teacher preparatory program
information concerning teacher shortage areas, [determined] identified
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 221
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, for at least the prior five years.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-156ii
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-8b
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4